Florida, session 2026, SB1100.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraph 13 (a) of subsection (5) of section 1002.33, Florida Statutes, are 14 amended, and paragraph (e) is added to subsection (15) of that 15 section, to read: 16 1002.33âCharter schools.â 17 (3)âAPPLICATION FOR CHARTER STATUS.â 18 (b)âAn application for a conversion charter school must be 19 made by the district school board, the principal, teachers, 20 parents whose children are enrolled at the school, or the school 21 advisory council at an existing public school that has been in 22 operation for at least 2 years before the application to 23 convert. A public school-within-a-school designated as a school 24 by the district school board may also apply to convert to 25 charter status. A municipality seeking to attract job-producing 26 entities by establishing a job engine charter school pursuant to 27 paragraph (15)(c) may apply to a the district school board, 28 Florida College System institution, or state university to 29 convert an existing public school to a charter school. An 30 application submitted proposing to convert an existing public 31 school to a charter school must demonstrate the support of at 32 least 50 percent of the parents voting whose children are 33 enrolled at the school, provided that a majority of the parents 34 eligible to vote participate in the ballot process, according to 35 rules adopted by the State Board of Education. A district school 36 board, Florida College System institution, or state university 37 that denies an application for a conversion charter school shall 38 provide notice of denial to the applicants in writing within 10 39 days after the meeting at which the district school board denied 40 the application. The notice must articulate in writing the 41 specific reasons for denial and must provide documentation 42 supporting those reasons. A private school, parochial school, or 43 home education program is not eligible for charter school 44 status. 45 (5)âSPONSOR; DUTIES.â 46 (a)âSponsoring entities.â 47 1.âA district school board may sponsor a charter school in 48 the county over which the district school board has 49 jurisdiction. 50 2.a.âA state university may grant a charter to a lab school 51 created under s. 1002.32 and shall be considered to be the 52 schoolâs sponsor. Such school shall be considered a charter lab 53 school. 54 b.âA state university may grant a charter to a municipality 55 establishing a job engine charter school. 56 3.âBecause needs relating to educational capacity, 57 workforce qualifications, and career education opportunities are 58 constantly changing and extend beyond school district 59 boundaries: 60 a.âA state university may, upon approval by the Department 61 of Education, solicit applications and sponsor a charter school 62 to meet regional education or workforce demands by serving 63 students from multiple school districts. 64 b.âA Florida College System institution may, upon approval 65 by the Department of Education, solicit applications and sponsor 66 a charter school or a job engine charter school in any county 67 within its service area to meet workforce demands and may offer 68 postsecondary programs leading to industry certifications to 69 eligible charter school students. A charter school established 70 under subparagraph (b)4. may not be sponsored by a Florida 71 College System institution until its existing charter with the 72 school district expires as provided under subsection (7). 73 c.âNotwithstanding paragraph (6)(b), a state university or 74 Florida College System institution may, at its discretion, deny 75 an application for a charter school. 76 d.âThe Charter School Review Commission, as authorized 77 under s. 1002.3301, may solicit and review applications for 78 charter schools overseen by district school boards and, upon the 79 commission approving an application, the district school board 80 that oversees the school district in which the charter school 81 will be located shall serve as sponsor. 82 (15)âCHARTER SCHOOLS-IN-THE-WORKPLACE; CHARTER SCHOOLS-IN 83 A-MUNICIPALITY.â 84 (e)âAll taxes levied by the school district within the 85 attendance zone of a conversion job engine charter school 86 sponsored by a Florida College System institution or state 87 university shall be provided to the sponsor annually, beginning 88 with the next fiscal year after such school is established. For 89 purposes of this paragraph, the term âattendance zoneâ means the 90 attendance zone of the public school at the time of the schoolâs 91 conversion to a job engine charter school. 92 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.